Rhode Island statutes. Title 2 Agriculture and Forestry
Chapter 20 Lumber Surveys

2-20-1.
Appointment of city and town surveyors and measurers.

The city and town councils of all cities and towns where boards, plank, timber, joist and scantling are imported for sale shall annually, on or before the first day of March, appoint one or more surveyors and measurers of boards, plank, timber, joist
and scantling, who are removable at the pleasure of the council. Each surveyor shall give bond, with two (2) securities, in the sum of five hundred dollars ($500), to the city or town treasurer for the faithful discharge of the duties
of the office.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 40, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 50, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 51, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 333, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

2-20-1

.

2-20-2.
Deputies for measurement of hardwood and ship timber.

The surveyor of lumber for any city or town may appoint one or more deputy surveyors, whose duty it is to survey mahogany, cedar and cherry tree boards, planks, joists and timber, and other ornamental or hardwood lumber, and ship timber, and the deputy
shall give bond with surety, as required in §

2-20-6

.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 135, § 15; G.L. 1909, ch. 161, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 191, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 388, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

2-20-2

.

2-20-3.
Surveyor for Providence — Election — Term.

There is a surveyor of lumber for the city of Providence, who is well skilled in the surveying and measurement of lumber. The surveyor shall be elected in the month of February annually, by the city council of the city, and shall hold his or her office
for one year and until a successor is chosen or unless the surveyor is removed sooner.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 135, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 161, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 191, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 388, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

2-20-3

.

2-20-4.
Bond of Providence surveyor.

The Providence surveyor shall, before entering on the duties of his or her office, give bond with two (2) sureties to the city treasurer, in the sum of two thousand dollars ($2,000), for the faithful discharge of his or her duties.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 135, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 161, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 191, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 388, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

2-20-4

.

2-20-5.
Deputy surveyors for Providence.

The Providence surveyor may appoint, subject to the approval of the city council of the city, a number of deputy surveyors, not less than six (6), that he or she judges sufficient, for whose official conduct he or she shall be answerable.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 135, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 161, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 191, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 388, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

2-20-5

.

2-20-6.
Bonds of deputies — Oath — Removal.

The Providence surveyor shall take bonds from his or her deputies for the faithful discharge of their duties, in the sum of five hundred dollars ($500) each, with surety, and the deputies shall be sworn faithfully to perform their duties, and shall be
removable by the surveyor for neglect of duty.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 135, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 161, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 191, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 388, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

2-20-6

.

2-20-7.
Returns by Providence surveyor.

The Providence surveyor shall make return to the city council of the city of Providence, on the first Monday in February annually, of all lumber surveyed by himself or herself or his or her deputies, specifying the various kinds and qualities and by whom
surveyed, and the amount of all fees received by him or her and his or her deputies pursuant to this chapter; and the city council shall cause those returns to be published in one of the newspapers published in the city.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 135, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 161, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 191, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 388, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

2-20-7

.

2-20-8.
Surveyors for Newport — Election — Bonds.

The council of the city of Newport shall annually, in the month of February, elect one or more surveyors and measurers of boards, planks, timber, joist and scantling, removable at the pleasure of the city council, who shall each give bond, with surety,
in the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000), to the city treasurer, for the faithful discharge of the duties of that office.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 135, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 161, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 191, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 388, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

2-20-8

.

2-20-9.
Records of surveys.

Every surveyor and measurer shall keep a true and faithful record of all surveys of lumber made by him or her, together with all figures made by him in taking an account of those surveys, and that record shall be open to the inspection of all persons.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 135, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 161, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 191, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 388, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

2-20-9

.

2-20-10.
Application of chapter to city and town surveyors.

Every surveyor and measurer of boards, planks, timber, joist and scantling, appointed by the city or town council of any city or town or by the council of the city of Newport, shall be subject to all the duties, provisions and penalties contained in this
chapter.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 135, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 161, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 191, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 388, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

2-20-10

.

2-20-11.
Imported lumber subject to survey.

All lumber brought by water or imported, discharged or delivered in this state, whether on the land or into a boat or vessel, except as provided in this chapter, shall be surveyed and measured according to the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 135, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 161, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 191, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 388, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

2-20-11

.

2-20-12.
Measurement of thin boards.

All boards less than three-fourths (3/4) of an inch thick shall be surveyed and measured in the same manner as to quality, quantity and numbers, as though they were of the thickness of one inch (1").

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 135, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 161, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 191, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 388, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

2-20-12

.

2-20-13.
Planks and joists.

All planks and joists shall be surveyed as to quality and numbers the same as boards and their contents measured and marked in board measure.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 135, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 161, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 191, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 388, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

2-20-13

.

2-20-14.
Measurement of mahogany and cedar.

In the survey and measurement of mahogany and cedar timber, there shall be allowed:

If the timber is sound and free from wane, two (2) inches on one side of the square, one inch on the other side and two (2) inches in length;

If the timber is wider on one side than on the other, the two (2) inches shall be taken from the narrow side;

If wany, two (2) inches on each side of the square;

For rot and shakes, there shall be an allowance made as the surveyor deems expedient, not exceeding one-half.

All timber that is wormeaten, very much rotten, badly shaked or very wany, shall be denominated refuse, and allowance shall be made for rot.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 135, § 16; G.L. 1909, ch. 161, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 191, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 388, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

2-20-14

.

2-20-15.
Grading of soft pine.

In the surveying of soft pine boards there shall be six (6) sorts:

The first sort shall be denominated number 1 and marked I, and includes boards free from sap, rot, knots, shakes and splits, not less than one inch thick, square-edged, and contains not less than sixteen (16) feet in quantity.

The second sort shall be denominated number 2 and marked II. Lumber of this sort does not have over one inch sap on the edges and is free from shakes, rot and knots, square-edged, and not less than seven-eighths (7/8) of an inch thick.

The third sort shall be denominated number 3 and marked III. Lumber of this sort shall be free from rot and shakes and nearly free from sap and knots.

The fourth sort shall be denominated number 4 and marked IV. Lumber of this sort is free from rot, shakes and large knots, suitable for cheap finish and dressing lumber.

The fifth sort shall be denominated number 5 and marked V. Lumber of this sort is square-edged, free from rot and shakes and suitable for barn and box boards.

The sixth sort shall be denominated number 6 and marked X. Lumber of this sort is not required to be square edged, and may have rot, shakes, knots and sap.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 135, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 161, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 191, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 388, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

2-20-15

.

2-20-16.
Grading of hard pine, spruce, hemlock, and juniper.

In the survey of southern hard pine, spruce, hemlock and juniper boards, planks and sawed and hewed timber, there shall be two (2) sorts: (1) The first sort shall be denominated merchantable, and shall include all boards, planks, joists and timber that
are sound and square-edged and well sawed; and (2) The second sort shall be denominated refuse and shall include all other descriptions, with allowance for rot.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 135, § 13; G.L. 1909, ch. 161, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 191, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 388, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

2-20-16

.

2-20-17.
Grading of mahogany, cedar, and cherry.

In the survey and measurement of mahogany, cedar and cherry-tree boards, planks and joists and other ornamental wood and lumber, that are sound and free from bad knots and shakes shall be denominated merchantable, all others shall be denominated refuse,
and allowance shall be made for rot and shakes.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 135, § 17; G.L. 1909, ch. 161, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 191, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 388, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

2-20-17

.

2-20-18.
Grading of other hard woods.

In the survey of ash, maple and other hardwood boards, planks, joists and timber, there are two (2) sorts: The first sort is denominated merchantable and shall include all boards, planks, joists and timber that are sound and free from bad knots and free
from shakes and rot; the second sort is denominated refuse, and shall include all other descriptions, with allowance for rot.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 135, § 14; G.L. 1909, ch. 161, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 191, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 388, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

2-20-18

.

2-20-19.
Marking of measure.

In the survey of all boards, planks, joists and timber, the contents of this lumber in board measure shall be marked on this lumber in plain and durable numbers, and all other marks, if not correct, shall be erased. In marking the contents of any lumber,
the board measure marks commonly used in marking boards shall only be used.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 135, § 18; G.L. 1909, ch. 161, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 191, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 388, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

2-20-19

; P.L. 2016, ch. 512, art. 2, § 40.

2-20-20.
Marking of grades.

The merchantable lumber shall be marked UNHANDLEDCHAR and the refuse lumber shall be marked

Λ
and shall be plainly and durably marked on each piece. Deduction shall be made for splits, not exceeding in any case one-half (1/2) the extent of the split.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 135, § 19; G.L. 1909, ch. 161, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 191, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 388, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

2-20-20

.

2-20-21.
Sale according to grading and measurement.

All boards, planks, joists and timber shall be received and sold according to their contents, as fixed and marked under the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 135, § 20; G.L. 1909, ch. 161, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 191, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 388, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

2-20-21

.

2-20-22.
Survey fees.

There shall be paid for the survey of all lumber, excepting hard woods, twenty-five cents (25¢) per one thousand feet (1,000´) board measure, for mahogany, cedar and cherry-tree timber, boards, planks and joists, fifty cents (50¢) per one thousand feet
(1,000´) board measure, for oak and other hard woods, for ship building, twenty-five cents (25¢) per ton, for ash, maple, birch and other hard wood, forty cents (40¢) per one thousand feet (1,000´) board measure, to be paid by the
purchaser, and in case the purchaser requires that a person should be employed to keep tally of the lumber, an additional fee of five cents (5¢) per one thousand feet (1,000´) shall be paid for that service. No stock lumber shall be
surveyed unless requested by the purchaser.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 135, § 21; G.L. 1909, ch. 161, § 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 191, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 388, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

2-20-22

.

2-20-23.
Fees retained by surveyor.

There shall be paid to the surveyor, of the fees provided for in this chapter, for his or her own use, three cents (3¢) on every one thousand feet (1,000´) of pine, spruce, hemlock and juniper boards, planks, joists and sawed timber, four cents (4¢) on
every ton of oak and other ship timber, six cents (6¢) on every one thousand feet (1,000´) board measure of mahogany, cedar and other ornamental lumber, ash, maple, birch and other hard wood.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 135, § 22; G.L. 1909, ch. 161, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 191, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 388, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

2-20-23

.

2-20-24.
Survey on land.

No lumber shall be surveyed on board a vessel when the lumber can be conveniently landed for the inspection of the surveyors.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 135, § 23; G.L. 1909, ch. 161, § 23; G.L. 1923, ch. 191, § 23; G.L. 1938, ch. 388, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

2-20-24

.

2-20-25.
Sale of unsurveyed lumber prohibited — Shipments for export.

No person within this state shall sell, purchase or take the delivery of, whether purchased outside of the state or within it or for his or her own personal use or otherwise, any boards, planks, joists or timber brought into the state unless this lumber
shall be surveyed, marked and numbered conformably to the provisions of this chapter, except the lumber that is intended to be exported beyond sea and that is shipped for the purpose of that exportation within one year after the lumber
has been sold and delivered to the person first purchasing or receiving this lumber in the state.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 135, § 24; G.L. 1909, ch. 161, § 24; G.L. 1923, ch. 191, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 388, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

2-20-25

.

2-20-26.
Importation or purchase for private use.

Every person importing or purchasing lumber for his or her own private use and benefit, upon giving a certificate to that effect to the surveyor, is not required to have the lumber surveyed and measured but if he or she should dispose of it in any other
manner than is provided in this section, he or she is liable to the same penalties as though the certificate had not been given.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 135, § 25; G.L. 1909, ch. 161, § 25; G.L. 1923, ch. 191, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 388, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

2-20-26

.

2-20-27.
Trans-shipments exempt.

No person purchasing lumber outside of the state and trans-shipping the lumber through this state to any other state, is required to have the lumber surveyed and measured.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 135, § 26; G.L. 1909, ch. 161, § 26; G.L. 1923, ch. 191, § 26; G.L. 1938, ch. 388, § 26; G.L. 1956, §

2-20-27

.

2-20-28.
Penalty for unlawful sales or delivery.

Every person who sells, purchases, delivers or takes the delivery of any boards, planks, joists or timber, in violation of any of the provisions of this chapter, shall pay for all boards, planks, joists and timber sold, purchased or delivered, one dollar
($1.00) per one thousand feet (1,000´) board measure, and the same for any less amount, one-half (1/2) of this penalty fee to go to the use of the state, and one-half of this penalty fee to go to the use of the surveyor of the town
or city in which this lumber is taken or delivered. The surveyor shall prosecute all violations of this chapter that come to his or her knowledge.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 135, § 27; G.L. 1909, ch. 161, § 27; G.L. 1923, ch. 191, § 27; G.L. 1938, ch. 388, § 27; G.L. 1956, §

2-20-28

.

2-20-29.
Penalty for alteration of marks.

Every person who willfully crosses, alters or defaces any mark affixed to any lumber by any deputy surveyor, shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00), to be recovered by the surveyor and to enure as provided in §

2-20-28

.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 135, § 28; G.L. 1909, ch. 161, § 28; G.L. 1923, ch. 191, § 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 388, § 28; G.L. 1956, §

2-20-29

.

2-20-30.
Penalty for fraud by surveyors.

Every person appointed to office under this chapter, or his or her deputy, who connives at any fraud or deception in surveying, marking or numbering the contents of any boards, planks, joists or timber, shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00)
for each offense.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 135, § 29; G.L. 1909, ch. 161, § 29; G.L. 1923, ch. 191, § 29; G.L. 1938, ch. 388, § 29; G.L. 1956, §

2-20-30

.

2-20-31.
Penalty for neglect of duties by surveyor.

Every surveyor or deputy surveyor who, on due notice and request, willfully neglects or refuses to perform the duties enjoined by this chapter shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for each offense.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 135, § 30; G.L. 1909, ch. 161, § 30; G.L. 1923, ch. 191, § 30; G.L. 1938, ch. 388, § 30; G.L. 1956, §

2-20-31

.

2-20-32.
Resurveys on request.

Any person dissatisfied with the survey and measurement of any lumber purchased or sold by him or her, by any deputy appointed by the surveyor, may require the surveyor, with one or more deputies, at the option of the surveyor, to reinspect the same.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 135, § 31; G.L. 1909, ch. 161, § 31; G.L. 1923, ch. 191, § 31; G.L. 1938, ch. 388, § 31; G.L. 1956, §

2-20-33

.

2-20-33.
Fees on reinspection.

If, upon a reinspection pursuant to § 2-30-32, an error is found in the survey above the amount of five dollars ($5.00), the person who surveyed the lumber shall receive no compensation for his or her services, and shall be fined not less than ten dollars
($10.00) nor more than twenty dollars ($20.00) and the surveyor and his or her deputy or deputies in other cases shall receive for their compensation twenty-five cents (25¢) per one thousand feet (1,000´), to be paid by the purchaser.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 135, § 32; G.L. 1909, ch. 161, § 32; G.L. 1923, ch. 191, § 32; G.L. 1938, ch. 388, § 32; G.L. 1956, §

2-20-33

.

2-20-34.
Expense of overhauling for reinspection.

The expense of overhauling lumber for the purpose of reinspection and of the reinspection, shall be paid by the person requiring the reinspection and in all these cases this compensation shall be equally divided among the surveyor and his or her deputy
or deputies.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 135, § 33; G.L. 1909, ch. 161, § 33; G.L. 1923, ch. 191, § 33; G.L. 1938, ch. 388, § 33; G.L. 1956, §

2-20-34

.

2-20-35.
State lumber exempt.

This chapter shall not be construed to require the survey or measurement of any lumber made in any city or town in this state.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 135, § 34; G.L. 1909, ch. 161, § 34; G.L. 1923, ch. 191, § 34; G.L. 1938, ch. 388, § 34; G.L. 1956, §

2-20-35

.